Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.380

Uniformed personnel—Higher education—Public employment relations commission to review bargaining units.

(1) By January 1, 2020, the public employment relations commission shall review the appropriateness of the bargaining units that consist of or include uniformed personnel and exist on July 28, 2019. If the commission determines that an existing bargaining unit is not appropriate pursuant to RCW 41.80.070, the commission may modify the unit.

(2) The exclusive bargaining representatives certified to represent the bargaining units that consist of or include uniformed personnel and exist on July 28, 2019, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an election as of July 28, 2019. However, there may be proceedings concerning representation under this chapter thereafter.

[ 2019 c 234 s 11.]